Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1408
Initiative and referendum petitions; Secretary of State; refuse filing; when.

The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any initiative or referendum petition which interferes with the legislative prerogative contained in the Constitution of Nebraska that the necessary revenue of the state and its governmental subdivisions shall be raised by taxation in the manner as the Legislature may direct.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 390.